Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,298
State Claims Board; meetings; hearings; notice.

The State Claims Board shall meet at such times and places and shall make such investigation of each claim or request referred to in section 81-8,297 as it determines necessary. If the board deems a hearing to be necessary or advisable on any claim or request so filed, it shall give to the claimant at least ten days' notice by regular mail of the time and place of hearing.

Laws 1943, c. 129, § 3, p. 433;

R.S.1943, § 81-859;

Laws 1957, c. 242, § 61, p. 867;

Laws 1967, c. 588, § 2, p. 2001;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 81-859;

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 29, p. 2853;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-8,237;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 48.